Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 16.1-228.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Abused or neglected child”
means any child:

Whose parents or other person responsible for his care creates or inflicts, threatens to create or inflict, or allows to be created or inflicted upon such child a physical or mental injury by other than accidental means, or creates a substantial risk of death, disfigurement or impairment of bodily or mental functions, including, but not limited to, a child who is with his parent or other person responsible for his care either (i) during the manufacture or attempted manufacture of a Schedule I or II controlled substance, or (ii) during the unlawful sale of such substance by that child’s parents or other person responsible for his care, where such manufacture, or attempted manufacture or unlawful sale would constitute a felony violation of §

18.2-248

;

Whose parents or other person responsible for his care neglects or refuses to provide care necessary for his health; however, no child who in good faith is under treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination shall for that reason alone be considered to be an abused or neglected child. Further, a decision by parents who have legal authority for the child or, in the absence of parents with legal authority for the child, any person with legal authority for the child who refuses a particular medical treatment for a child with a life-threatening condition shall not be deemed a refusal to provide necessary care if (i) such decision is made jointly by the parents or other person with legal authority and the child; (ii) the child has reached 14 years of age and is sufficiently mature to have an informed opinion on the subject of his medical treatment; (iii) the parents or other person with legal authority and the child have considered alternative treatment options; and (iv) the parents or other person with legal authority and the child believe in good faith that such decision is in the child’s best interest. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the provisions of §

16.1-278.4

;

Whose parents or other person responsible for his care abandons such child;

Whose parents or other person responsible for his care, or an intimate partner of such parent or person, commits or allows to be committed any act of sexual exploitation or any sexual act upon a child in violation of the law;

Who is without parental care or guardianship caused by the unreasonable absence or the mental or physical incapacity of the child’s parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person standing in loco parentis;

Whose parents or other person responsible for his care creates a substantial risk of physical or mental injury by knowingly leaving the child alone in the same dwelling, including an apartment as defined in §

55.1-2000

, with a person to whom the child is not related by blood or marriage and who the parent or other person responsible for his care knows has been convicted of an offense against a minor for which registration is required as a Tier III offender pursuant to §

9.1-902

; or

Who has been identified as a victim of sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking as defined in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. § 7102 et seq., and in the federal Justice for Victims of Trafficking Act of 2015, 42 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

If a civil proceeding under this chapter is based solely on the parent having left the child at a hospital or emergency medical services agency, it shall be an affirmative defense that such parent safely delivered the child within 30 days of the child’s birth to (i) a hospital that provides 24-hour emergency services, (ii) an attended emergency medical services agency that employs emergency medical services personnel, or (iii) a newborn safety device located at and operated by such hospital or emergency medical services agency. For purposes of terminating parental rights pursuant to §

16.1-283

and placement for adoption, the court may find such a child is a neglected child upon the ground of abandonment.

“Adoptive home”
means the place of residence of any natural person in which a child resides as a member of the household and in which he has been placed for the purposes of adoption or in which he has been legally adopted by another member of the household.

“Adult”
means a person 18 years of age or older.

“Ancillary crime”
or

“ancillary charge”

means any delinquent act committed by a juvenile as a part of the same act or transaction as, or that constitutes a part of a common scheme or plan with, a delinquent act that would be a felony if committed by an adult.

“Child,”“juvenile,”
or

“minor”

means a person who is (i) younger than 18 years of age or (ii) for purposes of the Fostering Futures program set forth in Article 2 (§

63.2-917

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 63.2, younger than 21 years of age and meets the eligibility criteria set forth in §

63.2-919

.

“Child in need of services”
means (i) a child whose behavior, conduct or condition presents or results in a serious threat to the well-being and physical safety of the child or (ii) a child under the age of 14 whose behavior, conduct or condition presents or results in a serious threat to the well-being and physical safety of another person; however, no child who in good faith is under treatment solely by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination shall for that reason alone be considered to be a child in need of services, nor shall any child who habitually remains away from or habitually deserts or abandons his family as a result of what the court or the local child protective services unit determines to be incidents of physical, emotional or sexual abuse in the home be considered a child in need of services for that reason alone.

However, to find that a child falls within these provisions, (i) the conduct complained of must present a clear and substantial danger to the child’s life or health or to the life or health of another person, (ii) the child or his family is in need of treatment, rehabilitation or services not presently being received, and (iii) the intervention of the court is essential to provide the treatment, rehabilitation or services needed by the child or his family.

“Child in need of supervision”
means:

“Child welfare agency”
means a child-placing agency, child-caring institution or independent foster home as defined in §

63.2-100

.

“The court”
or the

“juvenile court”

or the

“juvenile and domestic relations court”

means the juvenile and domestic relations district court of each county or city.

“Delinquent act”
means (i) an act designated a crime under the law of the Commonwealth, or an ordinance of any city, county, town, or service district, or under federal law, (ii) a violation of §

18.2-308.7

, or (iii) a violation of a court order as provided for in §

16.1-292

, but does not include an act other than a violation of §

18.2-308.7

, which is otherwise lawful, but is designated a crime only if committed by a child.

“Delinquent child”
means a child who has committed a delinquent act or an adult who has committed a delinquent act prior to his 18th birthday, except where the jurisdiction of the juvenile court has been terminated under the provisions of §

16.1-269.6

.

“Department”
means the Department of Juvenile Justice and “Director” means the administrative head in charge thereof or such of his assistants and subordinates as are designated by him to discharge the duties imposed upon him under this law.

“Driver’s license”
means any document issued under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2, or the comparable law of another jurisdiction, authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle upon the highways.

“Family abuse”
means any act involving violence, force, or threat that results in bodily injury or places one in reasonable apprehension of death, sexual assault, or bodily injury and that is committed by a person against such person’s family or household member. Such act includes, but is not limited to, any forceful detention, stalking, criminal sexual assault in violation of Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, or any criminal offense that results in bodily injury or places one in reasonable apprehension of death, sexual assault, or bodily injury.

“Family or household member”
means (i) the person’s spouse, whether or not he or she resides in the same home with the person, (ii) the person’s former spouse, whether or not he or she resides in the same home with the person, (iii) the person’s parents, stepparents, children, stepchildren, brothers, sisters, half-brothers, half-sisters, grandparents and grandchildren, regardless of whether such persons reside in the same home with the person, (iv) the person’s mother-in-law, father-in-law, sons-in-law, daughters-in-law, brothers-in-law and sisters-in-law who reside in the same home with the person, (v) any individual who has a child in common with the person, whether or not the person and that individual have been married or have resided together at any time, or (vi) any individual who cohabits or who, within the previous 12 months, cohabited with the person, and any children of either of them then residing in the same home with the person.

“Fictive kin”
means persons who are not related to a child by blood or adoption but have an established relationship with the child or his family.

“Foster care services”
means the provision of a full range of casework, treatment and community services for a planned period of time to a child who is abused or neglected as defined in §

63.2-100

or in need of services as defined in this section and his family when the child (i) has been identified as needing services to prevent or eliminate the need for foster care placement, (ii) has been placed through an agreement between the local board of social services or a public agency designated by the community policy and management team and the parents or guardians where legal custody remains with the parents or guardians, (iii) has been committed or entrusted to a local board of social services or child welfare agency, (iv) has been placed under the supervisory responsibility of the local board pursuant to §

16.1-293

, or (v) is living with a relative participating in the Federal-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program set forth in §

63.2-1305

and developed consistent with 42 U.S.C. § 673 or the State-Funded Kinship Guardianship Assistance program set forth in §

63.2-1306

.

“Independent living arrangement”
means placement of (i) a child at least 16 years of age who is in the custody of a local board or licensed child-placing agency by the local board or licensed child-placing agency or (ii) a child at least 16 years of age or a person between the ages of 18 and 21 who was committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately prior to placement by the Department of Juvenile Justice, in a living arrangement in which such child or person does not have daily substitute parental supervision.

“Independent living services”
means services and activities provided to a child in foster care 14 years of age or older and who has been committed or entrusted to a local board of social services, child welfare agency, or private child-placing agency. “Independent living services” may also mean services and activities provided to a person who (i) was in foster care on his 18th birthday and has not yet reached the age of 21 years; (ii) is between the ages of 18 and 21 and who, immediately prior to his commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice, was in the custody of a local board of social services; or (iii) is a child at least 16 years of age or a person between the ages of 18 and 21 who was committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately prior to placement in an independent living arrangement. “Independent living services” includes counseling, education, housing, employment, and money management skills development and access to essential documents and other appropriate services to help children or persons prepare for self-sufficiency.

“Intake officer”
means a juvenile probation officer appointed as such pursuant to the authority of this chapter.

“Jail”
or

“other facility designed for the detention of adults”

means a local or regional correctional facility as defined in §

53.1-1

, except those facilities utilized on a temporary basis as a court holding cell for a child incident to a court hearing or as a temporary lock-up room or ward incident to the transfer of a child to a juvenile facility.

“The judge”
means the judge or the substitute judge of the juvenile and domestic relations district court of each county or city.

“This law”
or

“the law”

means the Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Law embraced in this chapter.

“Legal custody”
means (i) a legal status created by court order which vests in a custodian the right to have physical custody of the child, to determine and redetermine where and with whom he shall live, the right and duty to protect, train and discipline him and to provide him with food, shelter, education and ordinary medical care, all subject to any residual parental rights and responsibilities or (ii) the legal status created by court order of joint custody as defined in §

20-107.2

.

“Permanent foster care placement”
means the place of residence in which a child resides and in which he has been placed pursuant to the provisions of §§

63.2-900

and

63.2-908

with the expectation and agreement between the placing agency and the place of permanent foster care that the child shall remain in the placement until he reaches the age of majority unless modified by court order or unless removed pursuant to §

16.1-251

or

63.2-1517

. A permanent foster care placement may be a place of residence of any natural person or persons deemed appropriate to meet a child’s needs on a long-term basis.

“Qualified individual”
means a trained professional or licensed clinician who is not an employee of the local board of social services or licensed child-placing agency that placed the child in a qualified residential treatment program and is not affiliated with any placement setting in which children are placed by such local board of social services or licensed child-placing agency.

“Qualified residential treatment program”
means a program that (i) provides 24-hour residential placement services for children in foster care; (ii) has adopted a trauma-informed treatment model that meets the clinical and other needs of children with serious emotional or behavioral disorders, including any clinical or other needs identified through assessments conducted pursuant to clause (viii) of this definition; (iii) employs registered or licensed nursing and other clinical staff who provide care, on site and within the scope of their practice, and are available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week; (iv) conducts outreach with the child’s family members, including efforts to maintain connections between the child and his siblings and other family; documents and maintains records of such outreach efforts; and maintains contact information for any known biological family and fictive kin of the child; (v) whenever appropriate and in the best interest of the child, facilitates participation by family members in the child’s treatment program before and after discharge and documents the manner in which such participation is facilitated; (vi) provides discharge planning and family-based aftercare support for at least six months after discharge; (vii) is licensed in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 671(a)(10) and accredited by an organization approved by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services; and (viii) requires that any child placed in the program receive an assessment within 30 days of such placement by a qualified individual that (a) assesses the strengths and needs of the child using an age-appropriate, evidence-based, validated, and functional assessment tool approved by the Commissioner of Social Services; (b) identifies whether the needs of the child can be met through placement with a family member or in a foster home or, if not, in a placement setting authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 672(k)(2), including a qualified residential treatment program, that would provide the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child in the least restrictive environment and be consistent with the short-term and long-term goals established for the child in his foster care or permanency plan; (c) establishes a list of short-term and long-term mental and behavioral health goals for the child; and (d) is documented in a written report to be filed with the court prior to any hearing on the child’s placement pursuant to §

16.1-281

,

16.1-282

,

16.1-282

.1, or

16.1-282.2

.

“Residual parental rights and responsibilities”
means all rights and responsibilities remaining with the parent after the transfer of legal custody or guardianship of the person, including but not limited to the right of visitation, consent to adoption, the right to determine religious affiliation and the responsibility for support.

“Secure facility”
or

“detention home”

means a local, regional or state public or private locked residential facility that has construction fixtures designed to prevent escape and to restrict the movement and activities of children held in lawful custody.

“Shelter care”
means the temporary care of children in physically unrestricting facilities.

“State Board”
means the State Board of Juvenile Justice.

“Status offender”
means a child who commits an act prohibited by law which would not be criminal if committed by an adult.

“Status offense”
means an act prohibited by law which would not be an offense if committed by an adult.

“Violent juvenile felony”
means any of the delinquent acts enumerated in subsection B or C of §

16.1-269.1

when committed by a juvenile 14 years of age or older.

1.

A child who, while subject to compulsory school attendance, is habitually and without justification absent from school, and (i) the child has been offered an adequate opportunity to receive the benefit of any and all educational services and programs that are required to be provided by law and which meet the child’s particular educational needs, (ii) the school system from which the child is absent or other appropriate agency has made a reasonable effort to effect the child’s regular attendance without success, and (iii) the school system has provided documentation that it has complied with the provisions of § 22.1-258; or

2.

A child who, without reasonable cause and without the consent of his parent, lawful custodian or placement authority, remains away from or deserts or abandons his family or lawful custodian on more than one occasion or escapes or remains away without proper authority from a residential care facility in which he has been placed by the court, and (i) such conduct presents a clear and substantial danger to the child’s life or health, (ii) the child or his family is in need of treatment, rehabilitation or services not presently being received, and (iii) the intervention of the court is essential to provide the treatment, rehabilitation or services needed by the child or his family.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-141; 1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 605; 1979, c. 15; 1981, c. 491; 1984, c. 631; 1985, c. 260; 1986, cc. 281, 308; 1987, c. 632; 1988, c. 794; 1990, cc. 704, 769, 842; 1991, c. 534; 1992, cc. 742, 830, 886; 1993, cc. 435, 467, 494; 1994, cc. 859, 865, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1999, cc. 453, 665, 697, 721; 2002, cc. 810, 818; 2003, cc. 538, 547, 835; 2004, cc. 245, 753; 2006, c. 868; 2008, cc. 475, 483; 2011, cc. 445, 480; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2016, c. 631; 2017, c. 623; 2018, c. 497; 2019, cc. 282, 688; 2020, cc. 95, 732, 829, 1227, 1246, 1285, 1286; 2021 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 254, 310, 550, 551; 2022, cc. 80, 81, 366, 414, 415.

Cross references.

As to the availability of confidential medical and mental health records of children maintained by the Department of Juvenile Justice, see §

16.1-300

.

As to the Uniform Collaborative Law Act, see Chapter 11 (§

20-168

et seq.) of Title 20.

As to foster care services for a child who is abused or neglected as defined in §

63.2-100

or in need of services as defined in §

16.1-228

, see §

63.2-905

.

As to parental or agency consent for adoption, and exceptions to consent requirement, see §

63.2-1202

.

For the definition in this section applying to the Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court rules, see Rule 8:2, in Volume 11.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the new paragraph added by Acts 2016, c. 631, was inserted following subdivision 6 of the definition of “Abused or neglected child.”

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-2000” for “55-79.2.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, in clause (ii) of the definition for “Child,” “younger” was substituted for “less” to conform to the language of Acts 2020, cc. 1285 and 1286. In the definition of “Ancillary crime,” “or that constitutes” was substituted for “or which constitutes” at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, cl. 2 provides: “The Board of Social Services (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. Such regulations shall include conditions for establishing a kinship guardianship, requirements for the development and amendment of a kinship guardianship assistance agreement, and circumstances that qualify a prospective kinship guardian for exemption from the relative foster home approval process. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and added the paragraphs defining “Ancillary crime,” “Boot camp” and “Violent juvenile felony.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 453, in the paragraph defining “Child in need of supervision,” in subdivision 1, deleted “and” preceding “(ii) the school,” and inserted “and (iii) the school system has provided documentation that it has complied with the provisions of § 22.1-258” near the end of the paragraph, and in subdivision 2, deleted “habitually” preceding “deserts or abandons,” and inserted “on more than one occasion” preceding “or escapes.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 665 substituted “any act involving violence, force, or threat” for “any act of violence” in the paragraph defining “Family abuse.”

The 1999 amendments by c. 697 and 721 are identical, and substituted “regardless of whether such persons reside” for “who reside” in clause (iii) of the paragraph defining “Family or household member.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and in the definition of “family abuse,” inserted “but not limited to,” substituted “results in bodily injury” for “results in physical injury,” and deleted “serious” following “apprehension of.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 538 and 547 are nearly identical, and substituted “12” for “twelve,” “14” for “fourteen,” and “18” for “eighteen” throughout the section; in the paragraph defining “Child in need of services,” in the first paragraph, inserted the clause (i) designation, and inserted “or (ii) a child under the age of 14 whose behavior, conduct or condition presents or results in a serious threat to the well-being and physical safety of another person,” and inserted “to the life or health of another person” in the second paragraph; and substituted “that” for “which” following “residential facility” in the paragraph defining “Secure facility.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 835 substituted “18” for “eighteen” in the paragraphs defining “Adult” and “‘Child,’ ‘juvenile’ or ‘minor”’; in the paragraph defining “Family or household member,” inserted “half-brothers, half-sisters” in clause (iii) and substituted “12” for “twelve” in clause (vi); and substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the paragraph defining “Violent juvenile felony.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 245 added the last paragraph in the definition of “Abused or neglected child.”

The 2004 amendment by c. 753 added the language beginning “including, but not limited to” in paragraph 1 of the definition of “Abused or neglected child.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 868, in the paragraph defining “Abused or neglected child,” inserted the subdivision 6 designation and the first paragraph thereof, transferred the second paragraph in subdivision 5 to the second paragraph in subdivision 6 and made a related change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 475 and 483 are nearly identical, and inserted the definitions of “Independent living arrangement” and “Independent living services”; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 445 and 480 are identical, and in the definition for “Family abuse,” in the first sentence, deleted “including, but not limited to, any forceful detention” following “threat,” inserted “death, sexual assault, or” and made minor stylistic changes, and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and in the last paragraph in the definition of “Abused or neglected child,” substituted “emergency medical services agency” for “rescue squad” twice and substituted “medical services personnel” for “medical technicians.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 631, added subdivision 7 in the definition for “Abused or neglected child.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 623, effective March 16, 2017, in the definition of
“Delinquent act,” deleted “blood or” preceding “breath test” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 497, in the definition for “Independent living arrangement,” inserted “(i),” deleted “and has been placed” preceding “by the local board” and inserted “or (ii) a child at least 16 years of age or a person between the ages of 18 and 21 who was committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately prior to placement by the Department of Juvenile Justice”; and in the definition for “Independent living services,” added clauses (ii) and (iii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 282 and 688 are identical, and added the definitions for “Fictive kin,” “Qualified individual,” and “Qualified residential treatment program.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 95 and 732 are identical, and in the definition of “Child,” “juvenile,” or “minor,” inserted “who is (1),” added clause (ii), and made a related change.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 substituted “Tier III” for “violent sexual” in subdivision 6 in the definition of “Abused or neglected child.”

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote the introductory language; added the definition of “Driver’s license”; and in subdivision 7 of the definition of “Abused or neglected child,” inserted “federal” twice.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1285 and 1286 are identical, and in the definition for “Child,” “juvenile,” or “minor,” substituted “younger” for “less”; in the definition for “Delinquent act,” substituted “does” for “shall” in the first sentence, substituted “ ‘delinquent act’ includes” for “the term shall include” in the second sentence and added the last sentence; in the definition for “Independent living services,” substituted “ ‘Independent living services’ includes” for “Such services shall include” in the last sentence and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 254, effective July 1, 2021, added clause (v) at the end of in the definition of “foster care services.”

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 310, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision 2, added the second and third sentences; and in subdivision 4, inserted “in subdivision 2.”

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the former last sentence of the definition for “Delinquent act,” which read: “For purposes of § §

16.1-241

,

16.1-273

,

16.1-278.8

,

16.1-278.8:01

, and

16.1-278.9

, ”delinquent act“ includes a violation of §

18.2-250.1

.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 80 and 81 are identical, and in the definition of “Abused or neglected child” in subdivision 7 in the second paragraph, inserted “within 30 days of the child’s birth,” “(i),” and “(ii),” deleted “or to” following “24-hour emergency services,” and substituted “or (iii) a newborn safety device located at and operated by such hospital or emergency medical services agency” for “within 14 days of the child’s birth”; and made a stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments by c. 366 inserted “or an intimate partner of such parent or person” in the definition of “Abused or neglected child” in subdivision 4; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 414 and 415 are identical, and deleted the definition of “Boot camp,” which read: “‘Boot camp’ means a short-term secure or nonsecure juvenile residential facility with highly structured components including, but not limited to, military style drill and ceremony, physical labor, education and rigid discipline, and no less than six months of intensive aftercare.”

Law Review.

For note, “The Constitutionality of Excluding Young People From Jury Service,” see 29 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 131 (1972).

For comment on termination of parental rights, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 213 (1980).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For 1987 survey of Virginia law as to children, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1987).

For survey on evidence in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 647 (1989).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For a review of Virginia legal issues involving children, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1001 (1999).

For article, “Gender Bias Task Force: Comments on Family Law Issues,” see 58 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1089 (2001).

For article, “Family Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

For article surveying developments in criminal law and procedure in Virginia from July 2001 to September 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 45 (2002).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For article, “Marriage Mimicry: The Law of Domestic Violence,” see 47 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 1841 (2006).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 72; 6B M.J. Drugs & Druggists, § 5; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 13.

§ 16.1-229.
This chapter controlling in event of conflict.

Whenever any specific provision of this chapter differs from or is in conflict with any provision or requirement of any other chapters of this title relating to the same or a similar subject, then such specific provision shall be controlling with respect to such subject or requirement.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-142; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559.

§ 16.1-229.1.
Removal of a child; names and contact information of persons with a legitimate interest.

In any proceeding held pursuant to this chapter in which a child is removed from his home, the court may order the parents or guardians of such child to provide the names and contact information for all persons with a legitimate interest to the local department of social services.

History.

2019, c. 434.